District of Columbia statutes.
42-1503

Effect of purchase for value without notice of trust; where express trust not declared in conveyance.

No implied or resulting trust shall be alleged or established to defeat or prejudice the title of a purchaser for a valuable consideration and without notice of such trust; and where an express trust is created, but is not contained or declared in the conveyance to the trustee, such conveyance shall be deemed absolute in favor of purchasers from the trustee for value and without notice of the trust.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1432, ch. 854, § 1618
1981 Ed., § 45-1103.
1973 Ed., § 45-1203.